District of Columbia statutes.
50-2353

Vehicle conversion; limited liability of original manufacturer.

(a)

The original manufacturer of a vehicle converted by a third party into an autonomous vehicle shall not be liable in any action resulting from a vehicle defect caused by the conversion of the vehicle, or by equipment installed by the converter, unless the alleged defect was present in the vehicle as originally manufactured.

(b)

The conversion of vehicles to autonomous vehicles shall be limited to model years 2009 or later or vehicles built within 4 years of conversion, whichever vehicle is newer.

History

Apr. 23, 2013, D.C. Law 19-278, § 4, 60 DCR 2119